Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 4

Officers

48-18-401. Required officers.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or designated by its board of directors in accordance with the bylaws. Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, officers shall be elected or appointed by the board of directors.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one (1) or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors' and shareholders' meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.40; 1989, ch. 451, § 11; 1999, ch. 272, § 1; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 31, 32.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Directors [and Officers] Making Business Judgments in Tennessee: The Business Judgment Rule, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 455 (2013).

48-18-402. Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.41.

48-18-403. Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge all duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interest of the corporation.

In discharging such duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation (or a subsidiary of the corporation) whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence.

An officer is not acting in good faith if the officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of office in compliance with this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.42; 1994, ch. 776, § 34.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Directors [and Officers] Making Business Judgments in Tennessee: The Business Judgment Rule, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 455 (2013).

48-18-404. Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specified a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause and any officer or assistant officer, if appointed by another officer, may likewise be removed by such officer.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.43.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1303.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Directors [and Officers] Making Business Judgments in Tennessee: The Business Judgment Rule, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 455 (2013).

48-18-405. Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer's resignation does not affect the corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.44.

48-18-406. Release or assignment of life insurance on officers.

When a corporation, organized under the laws of this state, has caused or shall cause to be insured the life of any director, officer, agent, or employee, or when such corporation is named as a beneficiary in or assignee of any policy of life insurance, due authority to effect, assign, release, relinquish, convert, surrender, change the beneficiary, or to take any other action with reference to such insurance shall be sufficiently evidenced to the insurance company by a written statement to that effect, signed by the president or secretary or other corresponding officer of such corporation. Such statement shall be binding upon such corporation, and any act done or suffered to be done by it upon the faith thereof shall protect the insurance company concerned, without further inquiry into the validity of the corporate authority or the regularity of the corporate proceedings. No person shall be disqualified, by reason of interest in the subject matter, from acting as a director or as a member of the executive committee of such corporation, on any corporate procedure touching such insurance.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.45.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1304.